Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-227
Riots; disorderly conduct; use of explosives; vagabonds; lights; bonfires; regulation.

A city of the first class may (1) prevent and restrain riots, routs, noises, disturbances, breaches of the peace, or disorderly assemblies in any street, house, or place in the city, (2) regulate, punish, and prevent the discharge of firearms, rockets, powder, fireworks, or any other dangerous combustible material in the streets, lots, grounds, and alleys or about or in the vicinity of any buildings, (3) arrest, regulate, punish, or fine vagabonds, (4) regulate and prevent the transportation or storage of gunpowder or other explosive or combustible articles, tar, pitch, resin, coal oil, benzine, turpentine, hemp, cotton, nitroglycerine, dynamite, petroleum or any other productions thereof, and other materials of like nature, the use of lights in stables, shops, or other places, and the building of bonfires, and (5) regulate and prohibit the piling of building material or any excavation or obstruction in the street.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXXIV, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 4843;

C.S.1922, § 4011;

C.S.1929, § 16-228;

R.S.1943, § 16-227;

Laws 2009, LB430, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 31;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 4.

City's delegated power hereunder to control storage of petroleum products must be exercised by ordinance. State ex rel. Andruss v. Mayor & Council of City of North Platte, 120 Neb. 413, 233 N.W. 4 (1930).